Utah statutes.
77-25-2.   Venue of prosecution by information.
Any prosecution by information, except in the case of a felony or class A
misdemeanor, shall be commenced before a magistrate in the precinct of the
county or municipality where the offense was alleged to have been committed,
except as otherwise provided by law.
